Wyoming, session 2026, HB0127.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 18-9-201(b) is amended to read:

18-9-201. Recreational facilities and systems of
public recreation; authority to establish and maintain;
joint action by political subdivision; tax levies; removal.

HB0127

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0479
(b) The board of county commissioners may levy and
expend funds for recreational purposes. Any levy imposed by
a school district for recreational facilities and systems
of public recreation shall not exceed one (1) mill on the
assessed valuation of a school district. A levy for
recreational facilities and systems of public recreation
imposed by a school district is in addition to the tax
limitations stated in W.S. 21-13-102. No tax shall be
levied under this subsection until a proposition to impose
the levy is submitted to a vote of the qualified electors
of the county or school district and a majority of all
votes cast within the county or school district vote in
favor of imposing the additional tax levy. The proposition
to impose the additional tax levy shall be submitted at an
election held on the same date of the general election. The
board of county commissioners shall publish notice of the
election in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county or school district and the election shall be
conducted in accordance with the procedures provided by
W.S. 22-22-301 through 22-22-304. The term of the tax levy
shall be four (4) years and the term of the tax levy shall
be stated in the proposition submitted to the voters. If a
proposition establishing the tax levy is approved, to
HB0127

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0479
continue the tax levy the proposition shall be submitted at
the second general election following the election at which
the proposition was initially approved and at the general
election held every four (4) years thereafter until the
proposition is defeated.

Section 2. Any tax levy imposed under W.S.
18-9-201(b) prior to the effective date of this act shall
expire on December 31, 2028 or on the date that a
proposition to impose a levy is submitted to the electors
as required by this act, whichever occurs first. If the tax
levy is approved by the electors, the levy shall continue
as provided by law.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0127